Maryland, session 2026, HB1186.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
[10–6A–05.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, an insurance policy sold in
connection with, and incidental to, a peer–to–peer car sharing program agreement under
the provisions of this subtitle is primary to any other valid and collectible coverage.
(b) Any insurance sold to a shared vehicle driver under the provisions of this
subtitle is not primary to the coverage provided by the peer–to–peer car sharing program
under § 19–520(d)(1) of this article.]
19–520.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Car sharing delivery period” means the period of time during which a
shared motor vehicle is being delivered to the location of the car sharing start time, as
documented by the shared vehicle owner under a peer–to–peer car sharing program
agreement.
(3) “Car sharing period” means the period of time that commences with the
car sharing delivery period and ends at the car sharing termination time.
(4) “Car sharing start time” means the time when a shared motor vehicle
becomes subject to the control of the shared vehicle driver at or after the time the
reservation of a shared motor vehicle is scheduled to begin as documented in the records of
a peer–to–peer car sharing program.
(5) “Car sharing termination time” means:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 50
(i) the time when the shared motor vehicle is returned to the
location designated by the shared vehicle owner through a peer–to–peer car sharing
program; and
(ii) the earliest of the following occurs:
1. the expiration of the agreed period of time established for
the use of the shared motor vehicle;
2. the intent to terminate the use of the shared motor vehicle
is verifiably communicated to the peer–to–peer car sharing program; or
3. the shared vehicle owner, or the shared vehicle owner’s
authorized designee, takes possession and control of the shared motor vehicle.
(6) “Intentional or fraudulent material misrepresentation” means an
affirmative statement or an omission by a shared vehicle owner that misrepresents
material facts about the shared vehicle owner or the shared motor vehicle.
(7) “Motor vehicle” has the meaning stated in § 11–135 of the
Transportation Article.
(8) “Peer–to–peer car sharing” means the authorized use of a motor vehicle
by an individual other than the vehicle’s owner through a peer–to–peer car sharing
program.
(9) “Peer–to–peer car sharing program” means a platform that is in the
business of connecting vehicle owners with drivers to enable the sharing of motor vehicles
for financial consideration.
(10) “Peer–to–peer car sharing program agreement” means the written
terms and conditions applicable to a shared vehicle owner and a shared vehicle driver that
govern the use of a shared vehicle through a peer–to–peer car sharing program under the
provisions of this section and Title 18.5 of the Transportation Article.
(11) “Shared motor vehicle” means a motor vehicle that is available for
sharing through a peer–to–peer car sharing program.
(12) “Shared vehicle driver” means an individual who has:
(i) reserved the use of a shared motor vehicle through a
peer–to–peer car sharing program; and
(ii) been authorized to drive the shared motor vehicle by the
peer–to–peer car sharing program.
– 3 –

Ch. 50 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(13) “Shared vehicle owner” means the registered owner of a motor vehicle
made available for sharing to shared vehicle drivers through a peer–to–peer car sharing
program.
(b) (1) Solely on the basis that a motor vehicle is shared through a
peer–to–peer car sharing program:
(i) a peer–to–peer car sharing program may not be considered to
have rented the vehicle under Title 18, Subtitle 1 of the Transportation Article;
(ii) the shared vehicle owner may not be considered to have rented a
vehicle under Title 18, Subtitle 1 of the Transportation Article; and
(iii) a peer–to–peer car sharing program may not be considered to be:
1. a rental vehicle company under § 18–108 of the
Transportation Article; or
2. a motor vehicle rental company under Title 10, Subtitle 6
of this article.
(2) Subject to subsection (e)(1) of this section, the use of a shared motor
vehicle through a peer–to–peer car sharing program does not constitute a commercial use
solely on the basis that the motor vehicle is available for sharing or used through a
peer–to–peer car sharing program.
(c) (1) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, a
peer–to–peer car sharing program shall assume the liability of a shared vehicle owner for
any bodily injury or property damage to third parties or uninsured and underinsured
motorist or personal injury protection losses during the car sharing period in an amount
stated in the peer–to–peer car sharing program agreement, which amount may not be less
than the minimum amount of security required under § 17–103 of the Transportation
Article.
(ii) Except for the minimum security required under § 17–103 of the
Transportation Article for any injured person who did not make the intentional or
fraudulent misrepresentation, the assumption of liability under paragraph (1) of this
subsection does not apply if the shared vehicle owner made an intentional or fraudulent
material misrepresentation to the peer–to–peer car sharing program before the car sharing
period in which the loss occurred.
(2) [Nothing in paragraph] PARAGRAPH (1) of this subsection DOES NOT
LIMIT:
(i) [limits] the liability of the peer–to–peer car sharing program for
any act or omission of the peer–to–peer car sharing program itself that results in injury to
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 50
any person as a result of the use of a shared motor vehicle through a peer–to–peer car
sharing program; or
(ii) [limits] the ability of the peer–to–peer car sharing program to,
by contract, seek indemnification from the shared vehicle owner or the shared vehicle driver
for economic loss sustained by the peer–to–peer car sharing program resulting from a
breach of the terms and conditions of the peer–to–peer car sharing program agreement.
(3) Each peer–to–peer car sharing program agreement made with respect
to a car sharing arrangement in the State shall disclose to the shared vehicle owner and
the shared vehicle driver:
(i) any right of the peer–to–peer car sharing program to seek
indemnification from the shared vehicle owner or the shared vehicle driver for economic
loss sustained by the peer–to–peer car sharing program resulting from a breach of the
terms and conditions of the peer–to–peer car sharing program agreement;
(ii) that a motor vehicle liability insurance policy issued to the
shared vehicle owner for the shared motor vehicle or to the shared vehicle driver does not
provide a defense or indemnification for any claim asserted by the peer–to–peer car sharing
program under item (i) of this paragraph;
(iii) that the peer–to–peer car sharing program’s insurance coverage
on the shared vehicle owner and the shared vehicle driver is in effect only during each car
sharing period and that, for any use of the shared motor vehicle by the shared vehicle driver
after the car sharing termination time, the shared vehicle driver and the shared vehicle
owner should contact the shared vehicle driver’s or the shared vehicle owner’s insurer about
insurance coverage; AND
(iv) [that the peer–to–peer car sharing program’s motor vehicle
liability insurance policy may be exclusive for the shared vehicle owner and is primary for
the shared vehicle driver, but may be secondary for the shared vehicle driver if the shared
motor vehicle is used as a replacement vehicle, as defined in § 18.5–102(a)(2)(i) of the
Transportation Article; and
(v)] the daily rate, fees, any insurance costs, and any protection
package costs that are charged to the shared vehicle owner or the shared vehicle driver.
(4) At the time when a vehicle owner registers as a shared vehicle owner
on a peer–to–peer car sharing program and prior to the time when the shared vehicle owner
makes a shared motor vehicle available for car sharing on the peer–to–peer car sharing
program, the peer–to–peer car sharing program shall notify the shared vehicle owner that,
if the shared motor vehicle has a lien against it, the use of the shared motor vehicle through
a peer–to–peer car sharing program, including use without physical damage coverage, may
violate the terms of the contract with the lienholder.
– 5 –

Ch. 50 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(d) (1) A peer–to–peer car sharing program shall ensure that, during each car
sharing period, the shared vehicle owner and the shared vehicle driver are insured under
a motor vehicle liability insurance policy that:
(i) PROVIDES COVERAGE IN AMOUNTS NOT LESS THAN THOSE
REQUIRED UNDER § 17–103 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE; AND
(II) 1. recognizes that the vehicle insured under the policy is
made available and used through a peer–to–peer car sharing program; [and
(ii) provides the minimum security required under § 17–103 of the
Transportation Article] OR
2. DOES NOT EXCLUDE THE USE OF THE SHARED MOTOR
VEHICLE BY A SHARED VEHICLE DRIVER.
(2) The insurance described under paragraph (1) of this subsection may be
satisfied by motor vehicle liability insurance maintained by:
(i) a shared vehicle owner;
(ii) A SHARED VEHICLE DRIVER;
(III) a peer–to–peer car sharing program; or
[(iii)] (IV) [both] ANY COMBINATION OF a shared vehicle owner, A
SHARED VEHICLE DRIVER, and a peer–to–peer car sharing program.
(3) (I) IN THIS PARAGRAPH, “REPLACEMENT VEHICLE” MEANS A
SHARED MOTOR VEHICLE THAT IS USED IN A PEER–TO–PEER CAR SHARING
PROGRAM WHILE A MOTOR VEHICLE OWNED BY THE SHARED MOTOR VEHICLE
DRIVER IS NOT IN USE BECAUSE OF LOSS, AS “LOSS” IS DEFINED IN THAT
INDIVIDUAL’S APPLICABLE PRIVATE PASSENGER AUTOMOBILE INSURANCE POLICY,
OR BECAUSE OF BREAKDOWN, REPAIR, SERVICE, OR DAMAGE.
(II) NOTWITHSTANDING PARAGRAPH (2)(II) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE MARYLAND AUTOMOBILE INSURANCE FUND MAY NOT BE
REQUIRED TO PROVIDE COVERAGE TO A SHARED VEHICLE DRIVER FOR USE OF A
SHARED VEHICLE THAT IS NOT A REPLACEMENT VEHICLE.
(4) (i) A peer–to–peer car sharing program shall have an insurable
interest in a shared motor vehicle during the car sharing period.
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 50
(ii) A peer–to–peer car sharing program may own and maintain as
the named insured one or more policies of motor vehicle liability insurance that provides
coverage in the amount of, in excess of, or optional to the minimum amount of coverage
required to be provided under paragraph (1) of this subsection, including coverage for:
1. liabilities assumed by the peer–to–peer car sharing
program under a peer–to–peer car sharing program agreement;
2. any liability of the shared vehicle owner;
3. damage or loss to the shared motor vehicle; and
4. any liability of the shared vehicle driver.
(iii) An offer by a peer–to–peer car sharing program to provide
coverage to a shared vehicle driver in the amount of, in excess of, or optional to the
minimum amount of coverage required to be provided under paragraph (1) of this
subsection, whether on a stand–alone basis or as part of a financial protection package,
shall be considered the sale or offer of insurance under Title 10, Subtitle 6A of this article.
[(4)] (5) The insurance described under paragraph (1) of this subsection
or authorized under paragraph [(3)] (4) of this subsection shall:
(i) as to coverage of the shared vehicle driver, pay claims on a first
dollar basis; and
(ii) be issued by:
1. an insurer authorized to do business in the State; or
2. solely with respect to insurance maintained by a
peer–to–peer car sharing program under paragraph [(3)] (4) of this subsection, an eligible
surplus lines insurer:
A. in accordance with the requirements of Title 3, Subtitle 3
of this article; and
B. having an A.M. Best financial strength rating of A– or
better.
[(5)] (6) (i) The insurance described under paragraph (1) of this
subsection shall, as to coverage of the shared vehicle owner, pay claims on a first dollar
basis.
(ii) This paragraph may not apply to the terms and conditions under
the insurance policy applicable to the peer–to–peer car sharing program.
– 7 –

Ch. 50 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(6)] (7) Consumer complaints concerning claims against a surplus lines
policy issued in connection with, and incidental to, a peer–to–peer car sharing program
agreement are subject to the Commissioner’s authority under § 27–303 of this article.
[(7)] (8) [(i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph,
the motor vehicle liability insurance policy described in paragraph (1) of this subsection
shall be primary with respect to the shared vehicle driver, but may be secondary to the
shared vehicle driver’s motor vehicle liability insurance policy if the shared motor vehicle
is used by the shared vehicle driver as a replacement vehicle, as defined in §
18.5–102(a)(2)(i) of the Transportation Article.
(ii)] If the insurance maintained by [the] A shared vehicle driver has
lapsed, or is otherwise not in force, the peer–to–peer car sharing program’s insurance
coverage required under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be primary.
(9) IF A CLAIM THAT ARISES OUT OF AN OCCURRENCE DURING THE
CAR SHARING PERIOD OCCURRED IN ANOTHER STATE WITH MINIMUM FINANCIAL
RESPONSIBILITY LIMITS HIGHER THAN THOSE REQUIRED UNDER § 17–103 OF THE
TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE, THE COVERAGE REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE IN AN AMOUNT UP TO THE MINIMUM COVERAGE
AMOUNT REQUIRED IN THE STATE IN WHICH THE CLAIM OCCURRED.
(e) (1) An authorized insurer that writes motor vehicle liability insurance in
the State and the Maryland Automobile Insurance Fund may exclude any and all coverage
and the duty to defend or indemnify for any claim afforded under a shared vehicle owner’s
personal motor vehicle liability insurance policy for any loss or injury that occurs during
the car sharing period.
(2) A motor vehicle insurer that defends or indemnifies a claim against a
driver that is excluded under the terms of its policy shall have the right to seek contribution
against the motor vehicle insurer of the peer–to–peer car sharing program if the claim is:
(i) made against the shared vehicle owner or the shared vehicle
driver for loss or injury that occurs during the car sharing period; and
(ii) excluded under the terms of its policy.
(3) Nothing in this section invalidates or limits an exclusion contained in a
motor vehicle liability insurance policy, including any insurance policy in use or approved
for use before October 1, 2018, that excludes coverage for motor vehicles made available for
rent, sharing, or hire or for any business use.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 50
(4) The right to exclude any and all coverage and the duty to defend under
paragraph (1) of this subsection applies to any coverage included in a motor vehicle liability
insurance policy, including:
(i) liability coverage for bodily injury and property damage;
(ii) uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage;
(iii) medical payments coverage;
(iv) personal injury protection coverage;
(v) comprehensive physical damage coverage; and
(vi) collision physical damage coverage.
[(f) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a motor vehicle
insurer may not deny, cancel, void, terminate, rescind, or nonrenew a personal motor
vehicle liability insurance policy of a shared vehicle owner solely on the basis that a motor
vehicle covered under the policy has been made available for sharing through a
peer–to–peer car sharing program.
(2) A motor vehicle insurer may deny, cancel, void, terminate, rescind, or
nonrenew a personal motor vehicle liability insurance policy covering a motor vehicle that
has been made available for sharing through a peer–to–peer car sharing program if the
applicant or policyholder of the personal motor vehicle liability insurance fails to provide
complete and accurate information about the use of a shared motor vehicle through the
peer–to–peer car sharing program as requested by the motor vehicle insurer during the
application or renewal process of the motor vehicle liability insurance policy.]
(F) THIS SECTION DOES NOT INVALIDATE OR LIMIT AN EXCLUSION
CONTAINED IN A MOTOR VEHICLE LIABILITY INSURANCE POLICY, INCLUDING AN
INSURANCE POLICY IN USE OR APPROVED FOR USE THAT EXCLUDES COVERAGE FOR
MOTOR VEHICLES MADE AVAILABLE FOR RENT, SHARING, OR HIRE OR FOR A
BUSINESS USE.
(g) [Nothing in this section:
(1) requires any shared vehicle owner’s personal motor vehicle liability
insurance policy to provide primary or excess coverage during the car sharing period;
(2) may be interpreted to imply that any shared vehicle owner’s personal
motor vehicle liability insurance policy provides coverage for a motor vehicle during the car
sharing period; or
– 9 –

Ch. 50 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) precludes a motor vehicle insurer from providing coverage for a shared
vehicle owner’s vehicle while the vehicle is made available or used through a peer–to–peer
car sharing program if the motor vehicle insurer elects to do so by contract or endorsement.
(h)] (1) Coverage under a motor vehicle liability insurance policy maintained
by a peer–to–peer car sharing program may not be dependent on the denial of a claim by
another motor vehicle insurer.
(2) A motor vehicle insurer of a personal motor vehicle liability insurance
policy may not be required to first deny a claim.
[(i)] (H) A peer–to–peer car sharing program and a shared vehicle owner shall
be exempt from vicarious liability [in accordance] CONSISTENT with 49 U.S.C. § 30106
and under any state or local law that imposes liability solely based on vehicle ownership.
[(j)] (I) In a claim coverage investigation following a vehicular accident, a
peer–to–peer car sharing program shall cooperate to facilitate the exchange of information
with directly involved parties and any motor vehicle insurer of a shared vehicle owner
regarding the vehicle’s use in a peer–to–peer car sharing program.
Article – Transportation
18.5–102.
(a) (1) A peer–to–peer car sharing program shall ensure that, during each car
sharing period, the shared vehicle owner and the shared vehicle driver are insured under
a motor vehicle liability insurance policy in accordance with § 19–520 of the Insurance
Article.
(2) (i) In this paragraph, “replacement vehicle” means a motor vehicle
that is used in a peer–to–peer car sharing program while a motor vehicle owned by the
individual is not in use because of loss, as “loss” is defined in that individual’s applicable
private passenger automobile insurance policy, or because of breakdown, repair, service, or
damage.
(ii) Subject to subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, a replacement
vehicle OR SHARED MOTOR VEHICLE that is made available through a peer–to–peer car
sharing program may be deemed to have satisfied the requirement of paragraph (1) of this
subsection by maintaining the minimum amount of security required under § 17–103 of
this article that is secondary to any other valid and collectible coverage and that extends
coverage to the owner’s motor vehicle in amounts required under § 17–103(b) of this article
while it is used as a replacement vehicle OR SHARED MOTOR VEHICLE.
(iii) For a replacement vehicle that is made available through a
peer–to–peer car sharing program, the peer–to–peer car sharing program agreement for
the replacement vehicle to be signed by a shared vehicle owner and a shared vehicle driver
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 50
shall contain a provision on the face of the peer–to–peer car sharing program agreement,
in at least 10 point bold type, that informs the shared vehicle driver and the shared vehicle
owner that the coverage on the vehicle being serviced or repaired is primary coverage for
the replacement vehicle and the coverage maintained by the peer–to–peer car sharing
program on the replacement vehicle is secondary.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of a peer–to–peer car sharing program
agreement to the contrary, the security required under this section shall cover the shared
vehicle owner and each person driving or using the shared motor vehicle with the
permission of the owner or the peer–to–peer car sharing program.
18.5–102.1.
(A) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO:
(I) PEER–TO–PEER CAR SHARING TRANSACTIONS
ORIGINATING IN THE STATE; AND
(II) THIRD–PARTY CLAIMS AGAINST A SHARED VEHICLE DRIVER
ARISING OUT OF THE SECURITY REQUIREMENT UNDER § 18.5–102(A)(2) OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(2) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A REPLACEMENT VEHICLE
UNDER § 18.5–102(A)(2) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) A PEER–TO–PEER CAR SHARING PROGRAM SHALL BE RESPONSIBLE FOR
PROVIDING THE REQUIRED SECURITY UNDER § 17–103 OF THIS ARTICLE ON A
PRIMARY BASIS FOR A THIRD–PARTY LIABILITY CLAIM IF THE PEER–TO–PEER CAR
SHARING PROGRAM:
(1) FAILS TO DELIVER NOTICE OF THE CLAIM;
(2) FAILS TO COOPERATE WITH THE INSURER;
(3) PREJUDICED THE HANDLING OF THE THIRD–PARTY CLAIM
BEFORE THE INSURER ASSUMED THE HANDLING OF THE CLAIM;
(4) HAS PROVIDED LIABILITY, PROPERTY DAMAGE, UNINSURED
MOTORIST, OR OTHER COVERAGE TO THE INSURED THAT IS:
(I) ADDITIONAL TO THE INSURANCE COVERAGE REQUIRED
UNDER § 19–520(D)(1) OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE; AND
– 11 –

Ch. 50 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) APPLICABLE TO THE THIRD–PARTY CLAIM AS A BENEFIT
UNDER A SUPPLEMENTAL INSURANCE POLICY SOLD TO THE SHARED VEHICLE
DRIVER IN CONNECTION WITH, AND INCIDENTAL TO, THE PEER–TO–PEER CAR
SHARING TRANSACTION; OR
(5) FAILS TO PROVIDE THE DISCLOSURES REQUIRED UNDER §
19–520(C)(3) OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE.
18.5–108.
(a) (1) A peer–to–peer car sharing program may charge a shared vehicle driver
a separately stated fee to recover the following costs incurred by the peer–to–peer car
sharing program:
[(1)] (I) Any concession fees paid to a government–owned or
government–operated:
[(i)] 1. Airport; or
[(ii)] 2. Other entity; and
[(2)] (II) Any other fee or charge imposed by a governmental entity.
[(b)] (2) If a peer–to–peer car sharing program advertises the rate available for
a shared motor vehicle in the State, the fees authorized under this [section] SUBSECTION
shall be clearly disclosed in the advertisement.
(B) A PEER–TO–PEER CAR SHARING PROGRAM MAY TRANSFER MONETARY
LIABILITY AND CHARGE A SHARED VEHICLE DRIVER FOR ANY TOLL, FEE, CHARGE,
OR FINE IMPOSED FOR ANY ACT OR OMISSION INVOLVING THE SHARED MOTOR
VEHICLE THAT OCCURRED WHILE THE VEHICLE WAS UNDER THE CONTROL OR
POSSESSION OF THE SHARED VEHICLE DRIVER DURING THE CAR SHARING PERIOD.
21–202.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(3) (i) “Owner” means the registered owner of a motor vehicle or a
lessee of a motor vehicle under a lease of 6 months or more.
(ii) “Owner” does not include [a]:
1. A motor vehicle rental or leasing company [or a];
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 50
2. A holder of a special registration plate issued under Title
13, Subtitle 9, Part III of this article; OR
3. A PEER–TO–PEER CAR SHARING PROGRAM UNDER §
19–520 OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE.
(5) “Traffic control signal monitoring system” means a device with one or
more motor vehicle sensors working in conjunction with a traffic control signal to produce
recorded images of motor vehicles entering an intersection against a red signal indication.
(d) (1) Unless the driver of the motor vehicle received a citation from a police
officer at the time of the violation, the owner or, in accordance with subsection (g)(5) of this
section, the driver of a motor vehicle is subject to a civil penalty if the motor vehicle is
recorded by a traffic control signal monitoring system while being operated in violation of
§ 21–202(h) of this subtitle.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 13 –